Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-506
State employment service; use of similar name prohibited.

No private employment agency shall print, publish or paint on any sign or window, or insert in any newspaper or publication a name similar to that of the Nebraska state employment service.

Laws 1921, c. 189, § 5, p. 703;

C.S.1922, § 7731;

C.S.1929, § 48-505;

R.S.1943, § 48-506;

Laws 1961, c. 235, § 2, p. 694;

Laws 1977, LB 162, § 5.